Hawaii statutes.
§329D-2 Medical marijuana dispensaries; authorized;
licensure. (a) No person shall operate a medical marijuana
dispensary unless the person has a license issued by the department pursuant to
this chapter.

(b) The director of health shall grant medical
marijuana dispensary licenses to allow dispensaries to produce, manufacture,
and dispense marijuana and manufactured marijuana products pursuant to this
chapter.

(c) Each medical marijuana dispensary license
shall allow production, manufacture, and dispensing of marijuana and
manufactured marijuana products only in the county for which the license is
granted.

(d) The department shall issue eight
dispensary licenses statewide; provided that three dispensary licenses shall be
issued for the city and county of Honolulu, two dispensary licenses each shall
be issued for the county of Hawaii and the county of Maui, and one dispensary
license shall be issued for the county of Kauai; provided further that no
dispensary license shall be issued for the county of Kalawao.

(e) No person may be granted a dispensary
license in more than one county.

(f) Up to two production centers shall be
allowed under each dispensary license, provided that each production center
shall be limited to no more than three thousand marijuana plants. For purposes
of this subsection, "plant" means a marijuana plant that is greater
than twelve vertical inches in height from where the base of the stalk emerges
from the growth medium to the tallest point of the plant, or greater than twelve
horizontal inches in width from the end of one branch to the end of another
branch; provided that multiple stalks emanating from the same root ball or root
system shall be considered part of the same single plant.

(g) A dispensary licensee may establish up to
two retail dispensing locations under the licensee's dispensary license.

(h) Each dispensary licensee may commence
dispensing medical marijuana and manufactured marijuana products to qualifying
patients or primary caregivers no sooner than July 15, 2016, with approval by
the department, in accordance with this chapter.

(i) Retail dispensing locations shall not be
at the same location as the dispensary licensee's production centers.

(j) Notwithstanding subsection (d), the
department shall determine whether, based on the qualifying patient need,
additional dispensary licenses shall be offered to qualified applicants in the
State after October 1, 2017; provided that the department shall make available
not more than one license per five hundred qualifying patients residing in any
single county.

(k) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, a dispensary shall not be subject to the prescription requirement of
section 329-38 or to the board of pharmacy licensure or regulatory requirements
under chapter 461. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 230, §15]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next